Utah statutes.
31A-22-400.   Scope of part.

This Part 4 applies to all life insurance policies and contracts, including:

(1)  an annuity contract;

(2)  a credit life contract;

(3)  a franchise contract;

(4)  a group contract; and

(5)  a blanket contract.

